Nevada, session 83, SB440-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Board of Examiners the sum of
$20,435,552 for one-time payments for personnel represented by the
bargaining units established in:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) Paragraph (e) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(c) Paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(d) Paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(e) Paragraph (i) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
2. Of the sum appropriated by subsection 1, not more than
$1,303,442 may be allocated and disbursed to the Nevada System of
Higher Education.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2024, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
-
*SB440_R2*

– 2 –
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 20, 2024.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the State Board of Examiners the sum of
$3,118,196 for one-time payments for personnel represented by the
bargaining units established in:
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) Paragraph (e) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(c) Paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(d) Paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(e) Paragraph (i) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2024, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State Highway
Fund on or before September 20, 2024.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*SB440_R2*